Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 177.253, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivisions 1 and 3 do not apply to employees in the following situations: new text end new text begin (1) when the employee is the only employee working at that time and location and is providing a service that protects or sustains life; new text end new text begin (2) when the employee is the only employee working at that time and location and is working with a vulnerable adult, as defined in section 626.5572, subdivision 21; and new text end new text begin (3) during an emergency response. new text end new text begin (b) An employee who qualifies for an exemption under paragraph (a) must still be allowed time to use the restroom while working. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 177.254, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivisions 1 and 4 do not apply to employees in the following situations: new text end new text begin (1) when the employee is the only employee working at that time and location and is providing a service that protects or sustains life; new text end new text begin (2) when the employee is the only employee working at that time and location and is working with a vulnerable adult, as defined in section 626.5572, subdivision 21; and new text end new text begin (3) during an emergency response. new text end new text begin (b) An employee who qualifies for an exemption under paragraph (a) must still be allowed time to eat a meal while working. new text end